District of Columbia statutes.
32-1602

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

Repealed.

(1A)

“Eligible training provider” means an organization that is approved to receive funds for individual training accounts for employment and training services, in accordance with criteria and procedures established by the Workforce Investment Council.

(1B)

“Individual training account” or “ITA” means the primary way individuals receive funds for training pursuant to the Federal Act.

(2)

“Federal Act” or “WIA” means the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 936; 29 U.S.C. § 2822). or the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, approved July 22, 2014 (Pub. L. No. 113-128; 128 Stat. 1425), in accordance with § 32-1612.01.

(3)

“Self-sufficiency” means the self-sufficiency level as established annually by the Workforce Investment Council.

(4)

Repealed.

(5)

“WIC” means the Workforce Investment Council established by § 32-1603.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 3, 47 DCR 4644
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(a), 62 DCR 1518
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-263 repealed (1) and (4); added (1A) and (1B); rewrote (2) and (3); and added (5).